Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1506.01
Application for reduction in value; waiver of notice.

Whenever any owner of real or personal property applies to the county board of equalization for a reduction in the taxable value of any such property, the owner shall be deemed to have waived notice of increase in the taxable value of such property which is found undervalued by the county board of equalization notwithstanding the provisions of any other statutes to the contrary.

Laws 1969, c. 673, § 3, p. 2598;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 211;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 167.